Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3502
Sections; purposes.

The purposes of sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423 are (1) to control and coordinate criminal offender record keeping within this state, (2) to establish more efficient and uniform systems of criminal offender record keeping, (3) to assure periodic audits of such record keeping in order to determine compliance with sections 29-209, 29-210, 29-3501 to 29-3528, and 81-1423, (4) to establish a more effective administrative structure for the protection of individual privacy in connection with such record keeping, and (5) to preserve the principle of the public's right to know of the official actions of criminal justice agencies.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 2.